extensions/portableLatex/MiKTeX/texmf/tex/plain/croatian/glhyphen.tex
%GLHYPHEN.TEX, %14.10.92

%tablica rastavljanja %verzija 1.00

\patterns{
a1a
a1e
a1i
a1o
a2s
4ast.
a1u
1bdi
1bdj
1bj
1bna.
1bne.
1bni.
1bno.
1bnu.
1ba
1bar
1be
.1be4s3
1bi
1b2l
1bl4j
1bo
1b2r
1bu
1ca
1ce
1ci
1c2j
1cma
1cmo
1co
1c2r
1cv
1cu
1d2a
1d2e
1d2i
1d2j4e
1d2o
1d2u
1d2r
1dl
1dna.
1dne.
1dni.
1dno.
1dnu.
1dne
1dno
1dv
d2j
e1a
e1e
e1i
e1o
e1u
1fa
1fe
1fi
1f4l
1fo
1f4r
1fu
1fj
1gma
1gmi
1gn
1gv
1ga
1ge
1gi
1g4l
1go
1gu
1g2r
1ha
1he
1hi
1ho
1hu
1hla
1hle
1h2r
1h2v
1hj
1hl
1hna.
1hne.
1hni.
1hno.
1hnu.
i1a
i1e
i1i
i3o
i1u
1j2a
1j4e
1j4em
1j4i
1j4o
1j4u
1ka
1ka.
k1c
1ke
1ke.
1ki
3k2l
1ko
1k4r
1ku
1ku.
1k2v
k1t2n
1la
1le
1li
1lo
1lu
l8j
1lja
1lje
1lji
1ljo
1lju
1ma
1ma.
1me
1mi
1m2je
1mo
1mu
1mr
1mj
1ml
1na
1na.
5nad
1naj5
1ne
1ne.
1ni
1ni.
n1k2t
n1k2c
n1t2n
1no
1no.
1nu
1nu.
n8j
1nja
1nje
1nji
1njo
1nju
o1a
o1e
o1i
o1o
o1u
o2s
o4st.
1pa
1pe
1pi
1p2l
1po
pod1
po3s
pot1
pre1
pre2d1
pre2t1
pri1
1p2r
1p2t
1pj
1pne
1pu
1ra
r1d2
1re
re3do
re3ta
1ri
1ro
1ru
3sa
3se
3si
3s2k
3s2l
3s2n
3s2r
3s2t
3sto
1s2t2v
3so
s4t.
3su
3sv2j
1sj
1sm
1sv
1sf
1sp
1t2j
1tl
1tka.
1tke.
1tki.
1tko.
1tku.
1ta
1te
1ti
t2en
1t2lo
1to
1t2r
1tu
1t2v
u1a
u1e
u1i
u1o
u1u
1va
1ve
1vi
1v2je
1v2l
1vla3
1v2lj
1vo
1v2r
1vu
1vj
1zdj
1zdr
1zj
1zl
1zv
1zr
1zg
1zm
1za
1z2b
1ze
1zi
1z2n
1zo
1zu
s8s
z8z
c8c
c8h
d8d
c8x
c8y
d8y
s8x
z8x
y8a
y8e
y8u }

\hyphenation{ ras-tav-lja-nje }
